Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-348
State park system; violations; penalty.

Any person violating sections 37-337 to 37-348 or the rules and regulations governing the public use or administration of a state park shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 13, p. 1468;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 295;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.33;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 106.